Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Fish Division.............................  $ 22,027,362
(2) Wildlife Division........................  $ 5,335,445
(3) Administrative Services
Division.....................................  $ 7,859,211
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 1,639,250
(5) Capital improvement.................  $ 162,361
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 2,610,614
(7) Habitat Division ........................ $ 5,209,356
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds from the Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund,  but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not  described in this section, collected or received by the State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $ 83,927,027
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 40,965,894
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 52,399,069
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 6,402,801
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 1,837,010
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 28,703,625
(7) Habitat Division ........................ $ 6,053,245
(8) Major construction and
acquisition................................. $ 500,000
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Parks and  Natural Resources Fund to
Enrolled House Bill 5009 (HB 5009-A) Page 1
the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for activities and projects  to implement Article
XV, section 4 (8), of the Oregon Constitution, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $ 5,208,570
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 1,358,414
(3) Habitat Division ........................ $ 201,260
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2021  Act col-
lected or received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $ 99,417,800
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 34,590,238
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 8,110,476
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 3,348,572
(5) Habitat Division ........................ $ 10,771,307
(6) Major construction and
acquisition................................. $ 3,100,000
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5009 (HB 5009-A) Page 2